Tennessee, session 114, SB1916.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-501(7), is amended by deleting
the subdivision and substituting instead the following:
(7) "Movable structure" includes a mobile home or such other movable structure
that is constructed as a trailer or semitrailer and designed to either be towed along the
highways or to be parked off the highways, and that may be used, permanently, as a
residence or apartment, or, temporarily or permanently, as an office, storehouse,
warehouse, or for any other commercial or industrial purpose;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SB1916
011011
- 1 -